Massachusetts, session 194th, S2239.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 164 of the general laws is hereby amended by striking out section 33A and 
inserting in place thereof the following section:- 
Section 33A. (a) No gas or electric company regulated by the department under this 
chapter may recover from any ratepayer of such company any direct or indirect expenditure by 
such company for promotional or political advertising as defined in this section. 
For the purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the following 
meanings:— 
''Advertising'', the commercial use by a utility of any media, including newspaper, printed 
matter, radio, and television, in order to transmit a message to a substantial number of members 
of the public or to such utility's consumers, including any costs associated with research, 
analysis, preparation, planning, or any other related costs identified by the department as related 

of 5 12 to public communication whose purpose is to promote the sale or consumption of natural gas, 
electricity, or other thermal energy, unless such advertising is specifically approved or ordered 
by the department. 
''Political advertising'', any advertising for the purpose of influencing public opinion with 
respect to legislative, administrative, or electoral matters, or with respect to any controversial 
issue of public importance. 
''Promotional advertising'', any advertising for the purpose of encouraging any person to 
select or use the service or additional service of a utility regulated by the department, or the 
selection or installation of any appliance or equipment designed to use such utility's service. 
For the purposes of this section, the terms ''political advertising'' and ''promotional 
advertising'' shall not include advertising which informs consumers of any utility on how they 
can conserve energy, reduce peak demand for energy, or other services, or otherwise use the 
services of any utility in a cost-efficient manner; is required by federal or state laws or 
regulations; informs consumers regarding service interruptions, safety measures, or emergency 
conditions; concerns employment opportunities with a utility; or relates to any explanation or 
justification of existing or proposed rate schedules, or notification of hearings thereon which 
informs consumers of and stimulates the use of products or services which are subject to direct 
competition from products or services of entities not regulated by the department or any other 
government agency. A communication shall be considered advertising, promotional advertising, 
or political advertising if any portion of the communication is advertising, promotional 
advertising, or political advertising as defined herein. 

of 5 33  (b) No gas or electric company regulated by the department shall recover through rates 
any direct or indirect cost associated with: (i) membership, dues, sponsorships, or contributions 
to any entity incorporated under Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 
including business or trade associations; (ii) charitable giving expenses, including contributions 
in cash or other quantifiable value to organizations qualified under section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) 
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; (iii) executive or legislative lobbying, as 
those terms are defined in section 39 of chapter 3, or soliciting others to engage in executive or 
legislative lobbying, including any costs for activities associated with lobbying such as policy 
research, analysis, preparation, and planning undertaken in support of lobbying; (iv) 
contributions to political candidates, campaign committees, issue committees, or independent 
expenditure committees or other political expenses; (v) institutional or good will advertising, 
which is primarily designed to improve the image of the company or the industry; (vi) litigation 
to influence, modify, or repeal existing federal, state or local regulations, legislation or 
ordinances; (vii) any costs, including marketing, administration, customer service, or other costs, 
for products or services not regulated by the department; (viii) tax penalties or fines issued 
against such company; (ix) travel, lodging, entertainment, gifts or food and beverage expenses 
for such company’s board of directors and officers or the board of directors and officers of the 
parent of such company; (x) any owned, leased or chartered aircraft for such company’s board of 
directors and officers or the board of directors and officers of the parent of such company; or (xi) 
investor relations.  
(c) No gas or electric company regulated by the department shall recover through rates its 
direct or indirect costs associated with its attendance in, participation in, preparation for, or 
appeal of any contested proceeding conducted before the department. Such costs shall include, 

of 5 56 but need not be limited to, attorneys’ fees, fees to engage expert witnesses or consultants, the 
portion of employee salaries associated with such attendance, participation, preparation or appeal 
of a contested proceeding and related costs identified by the department. 
(d) On or before March 1, and annually thereafter, each gas or electric company regulated 
by the department shall report to the department a list of expenses from the previous calendar 
year to ensure such company’s compliance with this section. Such report shall include, but need 
not be limited to: (i) a list of all outside services or vendors paid by such company; (ii) an 
itemized list of all expenses associated with activities described in subsections (a), (b), (c) for 
which recovery is prohibited by this section, including expenses made to third-party vendors, 
affiliates of such company, subsidiaries or parent of such company, or such company’s 
employees in the form of compensation; (iii) for each itemized expense associated with activities 
described in subsections (a), (b), (c), for which  recovery is prohibited by this section, the billing 
amount, date, identity of payee, and an explanation of the expense sufficient to describe its 
purpose; (iv) the job title, portion of salary, and expenses of any employees of such company, or 
any affiliates or parent of such company, for performed work associated with the activities 
described in subsections (a), (b), (c), for which recovery is prohibited by this section; (v) in the 
case of an expense associated with activities described in subsections (a), (b), (c) for which 
recovery is prohibited by this section, made to a third-party vendor by a centralized service 
company, parent of such company, or other corporate affiliate of such company, the identity of 
that third-party vendor; and (vi) any other itemized information deemed relevant by the 
department. 
No gas or electric company regulated by the department shall recover through rates any 
costs associated with the preparation of such report. 

of 5 79  (e) The department and the office of ratepayer advocacy established pursuant to section 
11E of chapter 12 shall monitor and investigate compliance and noncompliance with this section. 
If the department determines that a gas or electric company regulated by the department 
improperly recorded an expense for which recovery is prohibited by this section, the department 
shall assess a non-recoverable penalty against such company in an amount that is not less than 
the total amount of costs improperly recorded. In addition to assessing a non-recoverable penalty 
against a company pursuant to this subsection, the department shall order such company to 
refund the amount improperly recovered, plus interest, to customers. For each penalty assessed 
and collected from any such company pursuant to this section, a portion of the penalty, as 
determined by the department, may be distributed to ratepayers through a rebate, or distributed to 
the department and the office of ratepayer advocacy for the purpose of increasing resources for 
enforcing this section.